Idaho statutes. Title 43 IRRIGATION DISTRICTS
Chapter 3
POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec.

§ 43-301. Election of officers.

On the first Tuesday of January next following their election, the board of directors shall meet and organize as a board, elect a president from their number and appoint a secretary and treasurer, who shall each hold office during the pleasure of the board. At any regular or special meeting the board of directors may appoint an assistant secretary or an assistant treasurer, or both, and fix the duties, the length of term, and the amount of bond, of each of them.

§ 43-302. Office of board.

On the organization of the first board of directors of any such district they shall designate some place within the district as the office of said board: provided, that the board of directors may establish the office of the district temporarily outside of the boundary of the district, but within the county in which the same or some portion thereof is situated, in cases where the business of the district may be more conveniently transacted thereby; and if such temporary location be approved by a majority of the electors of the district voting at any regular election at which such question may be submitted then such temporary location may be fixed as the location of the office of the district for such period of years as may be designated on their ballots by the majority of such electors at such election.

§ 43-303. Meetings of board.

The board of directors shall hold a regular monthly meeting in its office, or in any other location the board deems more convenient and suitable within the boundary of the district, on the first Tuesday in every month or such date each month as it shall fix by resolution and such special meetings as may be required for the proper transaction of business. All meetings of the board shall be held in compliance with Idaho’s open meetings law as provided in chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code.

All meetings of the board must be public, and a majority shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. Unless otherwise provided by law, a question before the board shall be decided by a majority of the board members present. All records of the board shall be open to the inspection of any elector during business hours. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section and section 43-325, Idaho Code, shall be the exclusive method for inspection of records of the board.

§ 43-304. General powers of board — By-laws — Right of entry — Acquisition of property.

Said board shall have the power to manage and conduct the business and affairs of the district, make and execute all necessary contracts, employ and appoint such agents, officers and employees as may be required and prescribe their duties, to establish equitable by-laws, rules and regulations for the distribution and use of water among the owners of such land, as may be necessary and just to secure the just and proper distribution of the same, which said by-laws, among other things, shall establish a fiscal year, and in case the by-laws do not provide for the establishment of a fiscal year, the fiscal year shall commence the first day of November and end the thirty-first day of October of each and every year. Said by-laws, rules and regulations must be printed in convenient form for distribution throughout the district.

The board and its agents and employees shall have the right to enter upon any land and to make surveys, and may locate the necessary irrigation works and the line of any canal or canals, and the necessary branches for the same on any lands which may be deemed best for such location.

Said board shall also have the right to acquire, either by purchase, condemnation or other legal means, all lands and water rights, and other property necessary for the construction, use and supply, maintenance, repair and improvement of said canal or canals and works, including canals and works constructed and being constructed by private owners, lands for reservoirs for the storage of needful waters, lands and water rights for ground water recharge projects initiated pursuant to chapter 42, title 42, Idaho Code, and all necessary appurtenances. In case of purchase, the bonds of the district hereinafter provided for may be used to their par value in payment. Said board may also construct the necessary dams, reservoirs, ground water recharge facilities and works for the collection of water for said district, and do any and every lawful act necessary to be done that sufficient water may be furnished to each landowner in said district for irrigation purposes. The use of all water required for the irrigation of the lands of any district formed under the provisions of this title, together with the rights of way for canals and ditches, sites for reservoirs, ground water recharge projects and all other property required in fully carrying out the provisions of this title, is hereby declared to be a public use, subject to the regulation and control of the state, in the manner prescribed by law.

The board of directors of an irrigation district organized under the laws of the state of Idaho may enter into contracts for a water supply to be delivered to the canals and works of the district, and do any and every lawful act necessary to be done that sufficient water may be furnished to the lands in the district for irrigation purposes.

§ 43-305. Drainage of lands — Payment of cost — Apportionment of cost when payment deferred.

Any irrigation district heretofore organized or hereafter to be organized, may, whenever it appears necessary, proper or beneficial to drain any of the lands within said district, whether for the benefit of the land actually requiring drainage or for the protection of other lands within said district, whether the irrigation works have been actually acquired or constructed or not, cause drainage canals and works to be constructed and to this end such district shall in all respects have the same power and authority as is now conferred or may hereafter be conferred respecting irrigation, and all the powers conferred upon irrigation districts under the laws of this state with respect to irrigation shall be construed to include drainage.

Any irrigation district now, or which may hereafter be organized under the laws of the state of Idaho, shall have the authority to construct drainage works for the purpose of draining any land or lands within such irrigation district, and such authority shall be exercised by the board of directors in its discretion. The cost of any such drainage works may be paid for out of the maintenance, operation charges, tolls, or assessments, or out of either or all of such funds which are not otherwise necessary for the purposes for which such funds were created; that not to exceed twenty per cent (20%) of the total amount of such maintenance, operation charges, tolls and assessments for any year shall be expended for drainage.

In all cases where the construction of drainage works requires the issuance of bonds or such works are constructed by the United States under a contract by which the payments therefor are deferred, the board of directors of such irrigation district shall apportion the cost of such drainage works to each tract of land in said district according to benefits. In determining the amount to be apportioned to each tract of benefits under this section, the board of directors may consider benefits to each tract drained; the damage done to the low land from seepage and saturation from irrigation water from high land, and the necessity for carrying off waste water, and such high land may be considered as being benefited to the extent and in the amount that such lands are responsible for damage to low lands from seepage and saturation by irrigation water; the board may also consider any advantage to the lands of the district and each tract thereof, growing out of the construction of such drainage works. In lieu of issuing bonds or contracting with the United States for the construction of drainage works, the board of directors may consider such drainage works as a part of the irrigation system and may make levies to pay for the same upon the same basis as assessments for the construction of the irrigation works by which the lands of the district are irrigated. In all cases where the cost of drainage works shall be apportioned to all the tracts of lands of the district as herein provided, all the provisions of this title applicable to procedure and the confirmation of the apportionment by the court, including the right of appeal, shall be applicable to the apportionment of benefits under this section.

§ 43-306. Levy authorized for purpose of draining lands within district.

Any irrigation district now organized, or which may hereafter be organized, under the laws of the state of Idaho, shall have authority to construct drainage works for the purpose of draining, or reclaiming, any land, or lands, within such irrigation district, which authority shall be exercised by the board of directors in its discretion.

The board of directors before levy as hereinafter provided, shall determine by resolution spread on the minutes thereof if any of the lands within an irrigation district are in need of drainage, and should be drained to protect said land or other lands within said district from damage from seepage or other waters, subterranean or otherwise, then the board of directors of such district shall have the power and authority, at the time provided by law for levying assessments for the operation and maintenance of said irrigation district in addition to such assessments, to also levy an assessment against the lands of said irrigation district for drainage purposes, said levy not to exceed in any one (1) year forty per cent (40%) of the total amount levied for operation and maintenance purposes. Such assessment for drainage shall in all respects be levied and collected at the same time and in the same manner as assessments for operation and maintenance.

All funds collected for drainage purposes under the provisions hereof shall be kept in a separate fund to be known as “Drainage Fund” of said irrigation district, and the moneys in said “Drainage Fund” from time to time may be expended by the board of directors of said irrigation district.

§ 43-307. Authority to exercise functions of drainage districts.

Any irrigation district heretofore or hereafter organized under the laws of this state desiring so to do, and having received the petition required by and complied with the provisions of section 43-308[, Idaho Code,] as amended, and sections 43-309, 43-310, 43-311, 43-312[, Idaho Code], may exercise, and it is hereby given, all the functions, powers and authority of a drainage district and of its board of commissioners under the laws of this state relating to drainage districts. The functions, powers and authority granted by this act shall be exercised by such irrigation district through its board of directors and, so far as may be, in the manner provided in the drainage district laws of the state.

§ 43-308. Authority to exercise functions of drainage districts — Petition and resolution.

After receiving a petition signed by the holders of title or evidence of title to one-fifth (1/5) of the lands within the district praying it shall do so, any irrigation district desiring to accept the provisions of this act shall so declare by resolution adopted by majority vote of its directors and spread upon its minutes, and thereupon said district shall cause to be filed with the clerk of the district court of the county in which a greater portion of the lands of said irrigation district are located, its petition praying that the court shall set a day for hearing said petition and on and after said hearing make and enter its order and decree authorizing such irrigation district to perform all of the functions of a drainage district under the laws of the state of Idaho, and that there are lands within said district which need drainage: that there shall be attached to said petition so filed with the clerk of said court a true and correct copy of the petition of the said land owners in this section provided, together with a copy of said resolution of the board of directors of said district.

§ 43-309. Notice of hearing of petition.

After the filing of said petition the judge of said court shall fix the time for hearing said petition by order by him made, which order shall provide that said petition shall be published for at least three (3) successive weeks in some newspaper or newspapers printed and published in said county or counties in which the lands are situated, or in case no such paper is published in said county, then in some paper of general circulation therein; together with a notice of the time and place when said judge shall consider said petition.

§ 43-310. Hearing — Objections — Findings.

Upon the day fixed for the hearing of said petition, any person or corporation interest [interested] therein, may appear before said court and make objections in writing to the granting of said petition but said objections shall be limited to determining whether or not the granting of authority to said irrigation district to perform the duties and functions of a drainage district and as such perform such functions is a proper and advantageous method of accomplishing the reclamation and protection of swamped, bogged or water-logged lands and lands subject to overflow therein, and whether or not there is a reasonable probability that the object sought by granting such powers to said irrigation district may be accomplished, and whether or not the drainage of lands in said district will be conducive either to the public health, welfare or convenience or increase the public revenue; and at the hearing the court shall hear and consider such evidence only as may be presented for or against the petition or objections thereto. Thereupon the court shall make its findings upon the facts alleged in the petition and objections and any other facts necessary and proper for the determination of the propriety of granting such powers to said irrigation district; and if such petition be granted the judge of said court shall make findings of fact setting forth the facts found by the said judge upon the hearing of said petition.

§ 43-311. Decree granting petition — Vesting of powers and authority in district.

Upon the filing of the findings of fact at the final hearing of said petition, as set forth in the last preceding section, said judge, if he finds that the granting of said petition and the drainage of the lands in said irrigation district will be conducive either to the public health, welfare or convenience, or will increase the public revenue, or will be of special benefit to the majority of the acreage of the lands in said irrigation district, shall enter the decree of said court granting said petition. Thereupon a certified copy of same shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state: and from and after the date of said filing of said decree, said irrigation district shall be vested with all of such functions, powers and authority of a drainage district and its board of commissioners under the laws of this state relating to drainage districts. The function, powers and authority granted by this act shall be exercised by such irrigation district through its board of directors and so far as may be in the manner provided by the drainage district laws of this state.

§ 43-312. Appeals.

Appeal may be taken by any interested person from said decree of the district court to the Supreme Court by serving a written notice of such appeal upon the secretary of said board of the irrigation district, within thirty (30) days after the rendition of said decree by said court.

§ 43-313. Electric power plants — Construction and operation.

The board of directors of any irrigation district, organized under the laws of the state of Idaho, shall have the power to construct and operate, or to contract for the construction and operation, of electric power plants, power transmission lines, and all other works in connection therewith necessary or proper for generating and transmitting electric power, and for pumping water for irrigation and domestic use; and to contract to sell surplus power generated at such power plants.

§ 43-314. Electrical power plants — Sale of surplus power — Ratification of contract.

The question of the ratification of contracts for the sale of surplus power as provided in the preceding section shall be submitted in the same manner, and shall be governed by the same limitations and provisions as questions creating indebtedness: provided, that the form for the notices, and the form upon the prepared ballots, and the form for the returns, shall be so changed as to conform to the purposes of this and the preceding section. Notwithstanding any provisions of chapter 23, title 43, Idaho Code, or the provisions of this chapter, no election and no confirmation proceedings shall be required when the contract for construction of a hydroelectric plant by the district does not involve questions of indebtedness incurred by the district.

§ 43-315. Assessment for extermination of rodents.

The board of directors of an irrigation district may levy an assessment upon the lands within the district, not to exceed ten (10) cents per acre for the purpose of raising funds to be used for the extermination of gophers and other rodents. Said assessment shall be levied at the same time and in the same manner and with a like effect, as assessments levied for maintaining and operating the property of the district. Said assessments shall constitute a lien upon the property assessed and shall be collected, in like manner as assessments for maintenance and operation.

The funds realized from such assessment shall be used for the extermination of gophers and other rodents within the irrigation district, in such manner and by such means as the said board of directors may direct.

§ 43-316. Legal title to property.

The legal title to all property acquired under the provisions of this title shall immediately and by operation of law vest in such irrigation district, and shall be held by such district in trust for, and is hereby dedicated and set apart to, the uses and purposes set forth in this title. Said board is hereby authorized and empowered to hold, use, acquire, manage, occupy and possess said property as herein provided.

§ 43-317. Conveyance of property — Actions.

The said board is hereby authorized and empowered to take conveyance or other assurances for all property acquired by it under the uses and provisions of this title, in the name of such irrigation district, to and for the purposes herein expressed; and to institute and maintain any and all actions and proceedings, suits at law and in equity, necessary or proper in order to fully carry out the provisions of this title, or to enforce, maintain, protect or preserve any and all rights, privileges and immunities created by this title, or acquired in pursuance thereof. In all courts, actions, suits or proceedings the said board may sue, appear and defend, in person or by attorneys, and in the name of such irrigation district.

§ 43-318. Sale of personal or real property — Procedure — Sale of federal or state license or permit.

Personal or real property of an irrigation district including a federal or state license or permit may be sold or transferred by its board of directors whenever the board finds and by resolution declares that the district no longer has use therefor. This procedure shall not be applicable to sales of real property acquired in compliance with the provisions of chapter 7, title 43, Idaho Code, because of the failure to pay irrigation district assessments.

Whenever the board, by resolution, shall determine that the interest of the district in any federal or state license or permit is no longer required, it may, without independent appraisal or competitive bid, sell or transfer such federal license or permit upon such terms as may be fixed by the board; provided, that such resolution sets forth the license or permit to be sold or transferred and terms and conditions for sale or transfer, and provided further, that said resolution shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the district at least once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks preceding the date of sale; provided, however, that if within fifteen (15) days after the first publication of the resolution a referendum petition signed by qualified electors of the district equal in number to not less than ten percent (10%) of the electors of the district, based upon the aggregate vote cast at the general election of the directors of the district next preceding the filing of such petition, and at which election votes were cast in the election of directors, shall be filed with the secretary of the district requesting that an election be held upon the sale or transfer of such license or permit. Any election required to be held pursuant to a referendum petition filed in accordance with the provisions of this section, may be held separately or may be held concurrently with any other election authorized by law, pursuant to notice as provided in section 43-206, Idaho Code.
Any such election required to be held hereunder shall be called by resolution, which resolution shall also fix the date upon which such election shall be held, which shall be not more than forty-five (45) days following the receipt of petition requesting the election, the manner of holding the same and the method of voting for or against the sale or transfer. Such resolution shall also fix the compensation to be paid the officers of the election and shall designate the precincts and polling places and shall appoint for each polling place, from each precinct from the electors thereof, the officers of such election who shall constitute a board of election for each polling place, which officers shall consist of three (3) judges, one (1) of whom shall act as clerk. The description of precincts may be made by reference to any order or orders of the board of county commissioners of the county or counties in which the district or any part thereof is situated, or by reference to any previous order or resolution of the board or by detailed description of such precincts. Precincts established by the boards of the various counties may be consolidated for special elections held hereunder. In the event any such election shall be called to be held concurrently with any other election or shall be consolidated therewith, the resolution calling the election hereunder need not designate precincts or polling places or the names of officers of election, but shall contain reference to the act or order calling such other election and fixing the precincts and polling places and appointing election officers therefrom. The resolution calling the election shall prescribe an official notice of election, which notice shall be published once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, the last publication of which shall be at least ten (10) days prior to the date set for said election, in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, and no other or further notice of such election or publication of the names of election officers or of the precincts or polling places need be given or made. At such election the ballots shall contain the words “Sale—Yes” or “Sale—No.”

If, in the opinion of the board, such property does not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in value, it may sell the same without independent appraisal, notice or competitive bids.

Personal or real property, but not including a federal or state license or permit, exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in estimated value shall first be appraised by three (3) disinterested freeholders of the district, who shall be selected by the board. It may then be sold at public or private sale to the highest bidder for cash at not less than its appraised value, after due notice.

Notice of sale shall describe the property, the appraised value thereof (by separate items, if so appraised), and the time, place and condition of sale.

If the appraised value exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), notice of sale shall be posted in three (3) public places in each of the election precincts in the district (one of which shall be the office of the board) at least ten (10) days before the date of sale. The board, in its discretion, may order that, in addition to such posting of notice, the notice shall be published in a daily or weekly newspaper, published or having a general circulation in the district, for the number of times, not to exceed three (3), and on the dates that the board shall specify in its order.

If, at the time set for closing the bids, no bidder offers the appraised price, or more, the board may sell the property for such price, and upon such terms, as the board by resolution declares to be reasonable, without further appraisal, notice or competitive bids.

The respective election boards shall conduct the election in their respective precincts in the manner prescribed by law for the holding of district elections to the extent the same shall apply and shall make their returns to the secretary of the district.

In the event that no referendum petition is filed, or if so filed, and if it shall appear from the election returns that a majority of the qualified electors of the district who shall have voted on the proposition submitted hereunder at such election voted in favor of such proposition, the directors of the district shall, by resolution, authorize the sale or transfer under the terms prescribed and effective as of the end of the notice period hereinafter provided, and shall cause notice thereof to be published one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation within the district. For a period of thirty (30) days from the date of such publication, any person in interest may file suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to test the regularity, formality or legality of the proceedings authorizing the sale or transfer and the provisions of the contract of sale or transfer. After the expiration of such thirty (30) day period, no one shall have any right of action to contest the validity of the sale or transfer, or of the contract, or of the proceedings, or of any resolution of the board of directors regarding such sale or transfer, and said sale or transfer shall be conclusively presumed to be legal and no court shall thereafter have authority to inquire into such matter.

§ 43-318A. Trade-in or exchange of district property.

Whenever the board of directors of an irrigation district finds and by resolution declares that the district no longer has use for any personal property of the district, or finds and declares that such property is no longer economical to use, the district may, in lieu of the sale of said property as provided in section 43-318, Idaho Code, dispose of the property by exchanging the same in part payment for new or replacement property.

If the acquisition of the new or replacement property is required to be let to bid under the provisions of chapter 28, title 67, Idaho Code, the district shall include in its request for bids, a full description of the property to be exchanged as part payment, and shall permit any interested bidder to examine the same, and any contract let as a result of said bid shall be awarded on the basis of net cost to the district after allowance for the property to be exchanged in part payment.

Exchange of property will be permitted only when, in the opinion of the board of directors of the district, the sale of the property under the provisions of section 43-318, Idaho Code, will yield a lesser monetary return to the district than the exchange thereof as herein provided.

§ 43-319. Compensation of directors and officers.

The members of the board of directors shall fix the compensation board members shall receive for each day spent attending the meetings, or while engaged in official business under the order of the board and actual and necessary expenses. The term “actual and necessary expenses,” shall be deemed to include all traveling expenses and hotel expenses necessarily incurred by any director when absent from his residence in the performance of the duties of his office. The board shall fix the compensation to be paid to the other officers named in this title, to be paid out of the treasury of the district: provided, that such board shall, upon the petition of fifty (50) or a majority of the freeholders within such district, submit to the electors, at any general election, a schedule of salaries and fees to be paid hereunder. Such petition must be presented to the board twenty (20) days prior to a general election, and the result of the election shall be determined and declared in all respects as other elections are determined and declared under this title.

§ 43-320. Officers must not be interested in contracts.

No director or any other officer named in this title shall in any manner be interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom; and for any violation of this provision such officers shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and such conviction shall work a forfeiture of his office, and he shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $500, or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

§ 43-321. Special assessments — Elections — Collection of assessments — Delinquent list.

The board of directors may, at any time when in their judgment it may be advisable, call a special election and submit to the qualified electors of the district the question whether or not a special assessment shall be levied for the purpose of raising money to be applied to any of the purposes provided in this title, and shall, at the same time, fix a date upon which such assessment shall become delinquent, which date shall be not less than sixty (60) days nor more than ninety (90) days from the date of said meeting of said board. Such election must be called upon the notice prescribed, and the same shall be held, and the result thereof determined and declared, in all respects in conformity with the provisions of section 43-401[, Idaho Code]. The notice must specify the amount of money proposed to be raised, and the purpose for which it is intended to be used. At such elections the ballots shall contain the words “Assessment . . . . yes” or “Assessment . . . . no.” If two-thirds (2/3) or more of the votes cast are “Assessment . . . . yes,” the board shall immediately levy an assessment sufficient to raise the amount voted.

The assessment so levied shall be computed and entered on the assessment roll by the secretary of the board, and within ten (10) days after such assessment, the secretary must deliver the assessment book to the treasurer of the district who shall, within ten (10) days after receipt of such book, publish a notice in a newspaper published in each county in which any portion of the district may lie, that said assessments are due and payable and will become delinquent at six o’clock p.m. of the day fixed by the board of directors, naming such day and date, and also the times and places at which the payment of the assessment may be made; which notice shall be published for a period of two (2) weeks.

The treasurer must attend at the times and places specified in the notice to receive assessments which must be paid in lawful money of the United States. Within fifteen (15) days after the delinquent date as fixed by the board of directors, said treasurer shall begin the preparation of the delinquent list, which delinquent list shall contain a description of all the tracts of land upon which such special assessments are delinquent, and the amount of such assessment against each of the said tracts, and the name of the owner as shown on the assessment book. And on or before thirty (30) days thereafter, the treasurer shall complete said delinquent list, shall properly certify the same, and prepare a duplicate thereof; and deliver the delinquent list to the secretary of the district. At the same time the treasurer must commence to publish the delinquent list and publication shall continue three (3) weeks and must contain the names of the owners, a description of the property delinquent at that time, the amount of assessments and penalties and the costs due, opposite each name and description. After said publication shall have been made for the first time the treasurer shall collect twenty-five (25) cents in addition to the assessment and penalties on each description of lands published. The treasurer must append and publish with the delinquent list a notice that unless the assessments delinquent, together with penalties and costs, are paid, the real property upon which said assessments are made will be sold at public auction on the first Tuesday in September following date of notice. The publication must be made in some newspaper published in the district, if it can be so published, and if it cannot be so published, then in some newspaper published in the county in which the office of the board of directors is situated; and if it cannot be so published, then by posting in not less than three (3) places in said district, one (1) of which shall be at the door of the office of said board of directors.
The place of such sale shall be at the office of said board of directors. The treasurer, as soon as he has made the publication required, must file with the secretary proof of such publication by affidavit, or like proof of posting in case such notice was posted as herein required. Such sales and all proceedings thereafter shall be in accordance with the provisions of sections 4392 to 4401, both inclusive, of Idaho Compiled Statutes, where not in conflict herewith.

When collected such assessments shall be paid into the district treasury for the purposes provided in the notice of such special election.

§ 43-322. Power to incur debts — Warrants.

The board of directors, or other officers of the district, shall have no power to incur any debt or liability whatever, either by issuing bonds or otherwise, in excess of the express provisions of this section; and any debt or liability incurred in excess of such express provisions shall be and remain absolutely void: provided, that for the purpose of organization, or for any of the purposes of this title, the board of directors may, before the collection of the first assessment, incur indebtedness and cause warrants of the district to issue therefor according to the following limitations: Districts embracing fifty thousand (50,000) acres, or more, of irrigable land, not in excess of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) of warrants; districts embracing forty thousand (40,000) acres, or more, and less than fifty thousand (50,000) acres of irrigable land, up to twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) of warrants; districts embracing thirty thousand (30,000) acres, or more, and less than forty thousand (40,000) acres of irrigable land, up to nine thousand dollars ($9,000) of warrants; districts embracing twenty thousand (20,000) acres, or more, and less than thirty thousand (30,000) acres of irrigable land, up to six thousand dollars ($6,000) of warrants; districts embracing ten thousand (10,000) acres, or more, and less than twenty thousand (20,000) acres of irrigable land, up to four thousand dollars ($4,000) of warrants; districts embracing more than two thousand (2,000) acres, or more, and less than ten thousand (10,000) acres of irrigable land up to three thousand dollars ($3,000) of warrants, and districts embracing less than two thousand (2,000) acres of irrigable land up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) of warrants.

Provided, further, that for the purpose of defraying the expenses in the care, operation, repair and improvement of such portion of the irrigation works of the district as are completed and in use, including salaries of officers and employees, the board of directors of an irrigation district may at any time issue warrants of such district in payment of claims of indebtedness against the district, not to exceed the district’s anticipated revenue.

The warrants herein authorized shall be in form and substance the same as county warrants or as near the same as may be practicable and shall be signed by the chairman and attested by the secretary of said board. All such warrants shall be presented by the holder thereof to the treasurer of the district for payment who shall indorse thereon the day of presentation for payment with the additional indorsement thereon, in case of nonpayment, that they are not paid for want of funds, and such warrants shall draw interest at a rate to be established by the board of directors from the date of their presentation to the treasurer for payment as aforesaid until such warrants are paid. No warrants shall be issued in payment of any indebtedness of such district for less than face or par value. It shall be the duty of the treasurer from time to time when he has sufficient funds in his hands for that purpose to advertise in some newspaper in the county in which the district is situated requiring the presentation to him for payment of as many of the outstanding warrants as he may be able to pay. Ten (10) days after the first publication of said notice by the treasurer calling in any of said outstanding warrants, said warrants shall cease to bear interest, which shall be stated in the notice. Said notice shall be published two (2) weeks consecutively and said warrants shall be called in and paid in the order of their indorsement.
Provided, further, after an irrigation district has organized and has no warrants outstanding, the district may maintain its operation on a cash basis and pay by check the expenses of operation and maintenance, repair, improvement, obligations on contractual or bonded indebtedness, and all other general necessary expenses incurred by the district.

The board of directors, or other officers of the district, may incur debt by contracting indebtedness with a money-lending institution, subject to the election requirements contained in section 43-401, Idaho Code, or as described in section 42-322A, Idaho Code, but the term of such indebtedness shall not exceed thirty (30) years.